Florida, session 2026, SB694.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 94 95 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 96 found and declared to be true. 97 Section 2.â(1)âThe sum of $4 million is appropriated from 98 the General Revenue Fund to the Department of State for the 99 relief of the descendants of Charles Greenlee, Walter Irvin, 100 Samuel Shepherd, and Ernest Thomas. 101 (2)âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw a 102 warrant payable to the descendants of Charles Greenlee, Walter 103 Irvin, Samuel Shepherd, and Ernest Thomas as provided in 104 subsection (3). 105 (3)âTwenty-five percent of the sum appropriated under 106 subsection (1) must be provided to each of the following 107 individuals and estates: 108 (a)âCarol Greenlee Crawlee, the daughter of Charles 109 Greenlee. 110 (b)âThe Estate of Walter Irvin. 111 (c)âThe Estate of Samuel Shepherd. 112 (d)âGladys Rollerson, the daughter of Ernest Thomas. 113 Section 3.âA person compensated under this act is 114 ineligible for any further compensation related to the factual 115 situation described in this act. 116 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.